California, session 20252026, SB1265.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26016 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:26016. (a) The authority shall administer the GoGreen Program, previously known as the California Hub for Energy Efficiency Financing program, established by Public Utilities Commission Decision 13-09-044 (September 19, 2013), Decision Implementing 2013-2014 Energy Efficiency Financing Pilot Programs, and may use moneys collected from the ratepayers of electrical corporations and gas corporations, as directed by the Public Utilities Commission, and other available funding sources, consistent with the GoGreen Program’s purposes.(b) The GoGreen Program shall provide financing assistance, including, but not limited to, credit enhancements, to participating lenders to support residents in financing eligible energy efficiency and decarbonization measures at costs that are competitive with or below market rates.(c) (1) The authority shall establish and administer GoGreen Program guidelines and requirements as necessary for the effective administration of the GoGreen Program. To the extent ratepayer moneys are used for the GoGreen Program, those moneys shall be administered in a manner consistent with applicable directives of the Public Utilities Commission.(2) The authority may adopt regulations and take other administrative actions, as necessary and appropriate, at a publicly noticed meeting, to implement and operate the GoGreen Program. Any regulations governing the use of ratepayer moneys for the GoGreen Program shall be consistent with the Public Utilities Commission’s requirements on ratepayer moneys collected from electrical corporations and gas corporations.(d) (1) The authority may receive, administer, and use additional moneys from federal, state, local, or private sources to support and expand the GoGreen Program, if those moneys are used in a manner consistent with the GoGreen Program’s purposes and the parameters of the funding source.(2) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the GoGreen Program Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the authority, without regard to fiscal year, All moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the authority for expenditure pursuant to this section.